Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.101

Names on primary ballot.

Except for the candidates for president and vice president, or for a partisan or nonpartisan office for which no primary is required, the names of all candidates who, under this title, filed a declaration of candidacy must appear on the appropriate ballot at the primary throughout the jurisdiction for which they filed.

[ 2013 c 11 s 41; 2004 c 271 s 125.]